Utah statutes.
48-2a-504.   Sharing of distributions.
Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be made
among the partners and among classes of partners in the manner provided in
writing in the partnership agreement.  If the partnership agreement does not
provide in writing, distributions shall be made on the basis of the value, as
stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to Section
48-2a-105, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have
been received by the partnership and have not been returned.
